Massachusetts, session 194th, S2147.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “October,”, in line 100, the
following words:- John F. Kennedy Day.
SECTION 2. Section 15L of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “November”, in line 2, the following words:- in all odd-
numbered years and the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in all even-numbered
years.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 6 is hereby further amended by adding the following section:-
of 2

Section 222. There shall be a commission on the celebration of John F. Kennedy Day.
The commission shall consist of: 2 persons to be appointed by the governor; 2 persons to be
appointed by the state secretary, 1 of whom shall be designated to serve as chair; 1 person to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; 1 person to be appointed by the
minority leader of the house of representatives; 1 person to be appointed by the president of the
senate; 1 person to be appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 1 person to be appointed by
the executive director of the John F. Kennedy Library Foundation; 1 person to be appointed by
the president of the John F. Kennedy Hyannis Museum Foundation, Inc.; and 1 person to be
appointed by the president of the Edward M. Kennedy Institute for the United States Senate.
The commission shall recommend activities that promote civic engagement and
voter participation including, but not limited to: (i) establishing a Kindergarten to grade 12,
inclusive, education curriculum; (ii) hosting special events; (iii) marketing, which shall include
the publication and distribution of materials and online content; (iv) voter engagement activities;
(v) voter registration drives; and (vi) voter access. The commission shall meet not less than
semiannually. The commission shall issue an annual report to the clerks of the senate and house
of representatives not later than December 31.
of 2